California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall, within 60 days of receipt of the request, either decide the request or advise the claimant that additional information or documentation is needed, and, if the decision is a denial
 in whole or in part, it shall provide to the claimant and seller of travel a written statement of decision setting forth the factual and legal basis for the decision. No appeal may be taken pursuant to subdivision (g) until reconsideration has been requested and decided. The claimant shall not be entitled to any attorney’s fees incurred in connection with presentation of a claim or request for reconsideration.

(g) No decision of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation granting or denying a claim in whole or part shall be subject to review or appeal except as provided in this section. A claimant may seek review of the denial, in whole or part, of a claim by filing a notice of appeal after having served the notice by mail on the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation. The notice of appeal shall be filed and served on the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation not later than 30 days after a written statement of decision on a request for
 reconsideration has been mailed to the claimant. The notice of appeal from a decision of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court either in the county in which the principal place of business of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation is located, or in the county in which the claimant was a resident at the time the claimant purchased the transportation or travel services in dispute.

(h) The claimant shall pay the same filing fee as is required for appeals from small claims court. The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall file its response and the record of the claim before the corporation with the clerk of the superior court within 30 days of the day the notice of appeal was served on the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(i) Upon the filing of the record the clerk of the court shall schedule a hearing for
 the earliest available time and shall mail written notice of the hearing at least 14 days prior to the time set for the hearing.

(j) The hearing on appeal shall be limited to the record before the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation and any relevant evidence that could not have been with reasonable diligence submitted previously to the corporation. The reviewing court shall affirm the decision if it is supported by substantial evidence in light of the entire record. The pretrial discovery procedures described in Section 2019.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure are not permitted, there is no right to trial by jury, and the decision of the superior court shall be appealable by either party. No money may be claimed from or paid by the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund except in accordance with the provisions and procedures set forth in this article. No provision herein shall limit or otherwise affect those remedies as may be available against
 persons or entities other than the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(k) If the claimant prevails in whole or in part on an appeal, the claimant shall not be entitled to an award in excess of the amount of the original claim.

(l) Any claim awarded by the corporation shall be paid promptly by the trustee of the restitution fund when the time for appeal has passed. Any judgment on appeal shall be paid promptly by the trustee of the restitution fund whenever the judgment becomes final. If there should be insufficient funds to pay a claim when otherwise due, claims shall be paid in the order received. If the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation ceases to operate pursuant to the terms of Section 17550.52, any remaining trust funds shall be allocated on a pro rata basis to claims accruing prior to the corporation ceasing to operate, after payment of outstanding debts
 and liabilities as provided in Section 17550.57.

(m) A claim shall require a majority of at least three affirmative votes for denial, otherwise it shall be deemed granted.

(n) (1) A director shall not participate in the decision of a claim if the director has a financial interest in the outcome of the decision, has a financial interest in or is employed by the seller of travel that is the subject of the claim, or has any familial relationship or close personal friendship with either the claimant or any owner, officer, director, or manager of the seller of travel that is the subject of the claim.

(2) The director shall disclose to the other directors before a claim is considered all matters that disqualify the director from participating in the decision of the claim as described in paragraph
 (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.48.

Any person aggrieved who recovers from the fund shall assign to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation all rights of recovery, to a maximum of the amount received from the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund, against any person or organization from which the person aggrieved received any payment as compensation for any loss for which restitution was paid from the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund. The person aggrieved shall execute and deliver to the corporation instruments and papers and perform any other acts necessary to carry out this section. The
 corporation shall have the authority and discretion to determine whether or not to seek recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.49.

If the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation directs that payment be made from the restitution fund in any amount in response to a claim against a participant, the corporation shall inform the office of the Attorney General and shall maintain a record of all claims paid from the fund. A list of those sellers of travel on whose account payment has been made from the fund shall be provided upon written request. The corporation shall have the authority and discretion to determine whether or not to seek recovery from a seller of travel of any amounts paid from
 the fund. The corporation may seek that recovery by any lawful means, including, but not limited to, debt collection or civil litigation. If the corporation seeks recovery, it shall be entitled to collect from any seller of travel against which action is taken all reasonable expenses incurred in taking the action, including attorney’s fees. The corporation shall also be entitled to interest at the rate of 9 percent per year on the amount paid from the fund, together with all expenses and costs incurred by the corporation in connection with the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 790, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.50.

There shall be no personal liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation or the directors, officers, employees, or agents of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation on any decision to deny a claim for payment from the restitution fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.51.

The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall not be liable for any consequential damages, or for any punitive damages, in connection with the performance of its restitution function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.52.

The Attorney General or his or her delegate may determine that the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation has failed or ceased to operate upon a finding that any one of the following has occurred with respect to the corporation:

(a) Was not created.

(b) Has been dissolved.

(c) Has ceased to operate.

(d) Is insolvent or been the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy.

(e) Has failed to pay its operating costs.

(f) Has failed to pay any claim or judgment in a timely manner.

(g) Has violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state.

(h) Has invested its funds in violation of this article.

(i) Has not levied assessments as required by this article.

(j) Has not diligently decided upon a claim made by a person aggrieved.

(k) Has violated any section of this article.

(l) Has neglected or refused to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of the office of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 5.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.53.

(a) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall have independent authority to investigate claims filed by persons aggrieved pursuant to Section 17550.47.

(b) The corporation, upon the request of the office of the Attorney General, may participate in an examination or investigation of the books and records of a participant for the purpose of evaluating a claim related to that seller of travel. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any
 nature shall arise against, the State of California or any of its employees, agents, or representatives for the release of any information furnished to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation pursuant to this subdivision or in connection with the investigation or review of any claim.

(c) With the consent of a majority of its directors, the corporation, in order to fulfill its obligations under this article, may appoint an independent certified public accountant or public accountant or hire or appoint a specialized committee or employees to conduct an examination or investigation authorized by this section. Any reports as a result thereof shall be furnished to the office of the Attorney General.

(d) To assist the corporation in evaluating a claim related to a participant, the participant shall provide or make available for inspection by the corporation those books, accounts,
 bank account records, and files which are necessary for the corporation to evaluate the claim.

(e) The corporation, any participant, an agent of the corporation or any person other than a law enforcement agency who uses information obtained under this section for any purpose not authorized in this article or Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(f) Costs and expenses for any examination under this section shall be paid for by the participant if a claim directly related to that seller of travel has been approved and payment has been made to a person aggrieved. The corporation may maintain an action for recovery of these examination costs and expenses in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall recover its reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.54.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles for the incorporation of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation or an amendment to the articles unless the office of the Attorney General has issued written approval of the articles or amendment.

(b) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall not adopt any bylaws or amendments thereto without the written consent of the office of the Attorney General. If the office of the Attorney General does not approve or
 disapprove any bylaws or amendments within 60 days of receipt, such bylaws or amendments shall be deemed to be approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.55.

No provision of the Insurance Code shall apply to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.56.

The operation of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall at all times be subject to the examination and review of the office of the Attorney General and its duly designated representatives. The office of the Attorney General and its duly designated representatives may at any time investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, record, and files used by the corporation. The office of the Attorney General and its duly designated representatives shall have free access to the offices, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of
 the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.57.

If the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation is dissolved or ceases to exist, or if the Attorney General or his or her delegate makes a determination pursuant to Section 17550.52 that the corporation has failed or ceased to operate, all outstanding debts, obligations of the corporation, and amounts due for services rendered shall first be paid from the remaining assets, including the restitution fund. The assets remaining after settling all those liabilities shall be distributed to the participants, less the costs of that distribution. The distribution to
 participants shall be pro rata based upon the ratio of the number of locations in the state from which the participant does business to the total number of locations for all registered participants at the time the corporation is dissolved or ceases to exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.58.

All costs and expenses incurred by the Department of Justice in the administration of this article, including those incurred pursuant to Section 17550.38, shall be paid to the department by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation. The department may institute an action for the recovery of costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this article in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.8. Educational Travel Organizations [17552. - 17556.5.]

17552.

(a) “Educational travel organization” or “organization” means a person, partnership, corporation, or other entity who offers educational travel programs for students residing, in the State of California.

(b) “Student traveler” or “student” means a person who is enrolled in elementary or secondary school, grade kindergarten through grade 12, at the time an educational travel program is arranged with an educational travel organization.

(c) “Educational travel program,” means travel services, as defined in Section 17550.9, that are arranged through or offered to an elementary or secondary school in this state, and where the services are represented to include an educational program as a component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17553.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as exempting an educational travel organization from compliance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 17540), Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550), or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17554.

An educational travel organization may not arrange an educational travel program before the organization involved has first entered into a written contract with the educational institution. The written contract shall include all of the following:

(a) The educational travel organization’s name, trade or business name, business address, and business telephone number, including a 24-hour emergency telephone number or 24-hour emergency contact by pager, voice mail, or other method of 24-hour
 telecommunications.

(b) An itemized statement of the services to be provided as a part of the program and the agreed cost for the services. The statement shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A statement as to whether or not the educational travel organization maintains insurance that supplies coverage in the event of injury to any student traveler. The statement shall include the type and amount of coverage, the policy number and issuer, and the name, address, and telephone number of the person or organization who is able to verify the coverage.

(2) Any additional costs to students.

(3) The qualifications, if any, for experience and training that are required to be met by the educational travel organization’s staff who shall
 accompany students on the educational travel program.

(c) A written description of the educational program being contracted for, including a copy of all materials to be provided to students.

(d) The number of times the educational travel program or a substantially similar educational travel program that is the subject of the contract has been conducted by the educational travel organization and the number of students who completed that program.

(e) The length of time the educational travel organization has either been arranging or conducting educational travel programs, and, at the option of the educational travel organization, other travel services with substantially similar components.

(f) The name of each owner and principal of the educational travel
 organization.

(g) A statement as to whether any owner or principal of the educational travel organization has had entered against him or her any judgment, including a stipulated judgment, order, made a plea of nolo contendere, or been convicted of any criminal violation, in connection with the sale of any travel services for a period of 10 years predating the contract.

For purposes of this section, “owner” means a person or organization who owns or controls 10 percent or more of the equity of, or otherwise has claim to 10 percent or more of the net income of, the educational travel organization; and “principal” means an owner, an officer of a corporation, a general partner of a partnership, or a sole proprietor of a sole proprietorship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17555.

In addition to other requirements and prohibitions of this article, it is a violation of this article for an educational travel organization to place or use any misleading or untruthful advertising or statements or make a substantial misrepresentation in conducting an educational travel program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17556.

(a) Where any school or student, or that student’s parent or guardian, is injured by a violation of this article, the school, the student, or his or her parent or guardian, may bring an action for recovery of damages or for injunctive relief, or both. Proceedings for injunctive relief shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that no undertaking shall be required.

(b) Judgment shall be entered for
 actual damages. An award, if the trial court deems it proper, may be entered for punitive damages. The plaintiff shall also be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) The remedies or penalties provided by this article are not exclusive to each other nor to any other remedies or penalties provided under any other law, and shall not be construed as a limitation on any other applicable remedy or penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17556.5.

Except as otherwise provided, a person who violates a provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, which offense is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition, upon a conviction of a violation of this article, the court may issue an injunction and prohibit the convicted person from acting as an educational travel organization in this state, in which case the court shall inform the Attorney General of that
 action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Motel and Motor Court Rate Signs [17560. - 17568.]

17560.

“Outdoor sign” or “outside sign” as used in this article means any sign visible to passers-by whether the same shall be located within or without buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17561.

“Room rates” as used in this article means the rates at which rooms or other accommodations are rented to occupants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17562.

“Operator” as used in this article includes a manager or any person in charge of the operation of motels and like establishments. “Operator” or “owner” includes natural persons, firms and corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17563.

This article shall apply to operators and owners of motels, motor courts, and like establishments, and to such establishments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17564.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of any establishment within the scope of this article, located within the State of California, to post or maintain posted on any outdoor or outside advertising sign pertaining to such establishment, any rates for accommodations in such establishment unless the sign shall have posted thereon the rates charged for all rooms, or other rental units or accommodations offered for rental, the number of rooms or other rental units offered for rental at each rate, and the number of persons accommodated at the rate posted. All posted rates and descriptive data required by this article shall be in type and material of the same size and
 prominence as the aforesaid data. This section shall not be held to be complied with by signs stating the rate per person or bearing the legend “and up.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1733.)
-------------------------------------------

17565.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of any establishment within the scope of this article to post or maintain posted on outdoor or outside advertising signs rates for accommodations in any such establishment unless there shall be posted prominently and conspicuously in the area where guests are normally registered, a list of all rooms or other rental units offered for rental by such establishment, and the rates charged for each room when occupied by one person or two persons, and the rate charged for each additional occupant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1733.)
-------------------------------------------

17566.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of any establishment within the scope of this article to post or maintain outdoor or outside advertising signs in connection with any such establishment relating to rates which shall have thereon any untrue, misleading, false, or fraudulent representations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17567.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed so as to require establishments within the scope of this article to have outdoor or outside signs. This article, however, shall be liberally construed so as to prevent untrue, misleading, false, or fraudulent representations relating to rates being placed upon outdoor or outside signs pertaining to such establishments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

17567.5.

The governing body of any city, county, or city and county may, pursuant to reasonable exercise of the police power, enact ordinances imposing regulations equal to or greater than those imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 741.)
-------------------------------------------

17568.

Any person violating the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 52.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Hotel And Motel Advertised Rates [17568.5. - 17568.8.]

17568.5.

Upon the proclamation of a state of emergency resulting from an earthquake, flood, fire, riot, storm, or other natural disaster declared by the President of the United States or the Governor, or upon the declaration of a local emergency resulting from an earthquake, flood, fire, riot, storm, or other natural disaster by the executive officer of any county, city, or city and county, and for a period of 30 days following that proclamation or declaration, an owner or operator of a hotel or motel may not increase the hotel or motel’s regular rates, as advertised
 immediately prior to the proclamation or declaration of emergency, by more than 10 percent. This prohibition does not apply if the owner or operator can prove that the increase in price is directly attributable to additional costs imposed on it for goods or labor used in its business, to seasonal adjustments in rates that are regularly scheduled, or to previously contracted rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17568.6.

(a) (1) A place of short-term lodging, an internet website, application, or other similar centralized platform, or any other person shall not advertise, display, or offer a room rate, as defined in Section 17561, that does not include all
 fees or charges required to stay at the short-term lodging except taxes and fees imposed by a government on the stay.

(2) A place of short-term lodging, an internet website, application, or other similar centralized
 platform, or any other person shall include in the total price to be paid, before the consumer reserves the stay, all taxes and fees imposed by a government on the stay.

(b) For purposes of this section, “short-term lodging” means any hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other transient lodging. “Short-term lodging” also includes a short-term rental, or a residential
 property
 that is rented to a visitor for 30 consecutive days or less through a centralized platform whereby the rental is advertised, displayed, or offered and payments for the rental are processed.

(c) For purposes of this section, assessments under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13995) of Part 4.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or under Part 6 (commencing with Section 36500) or Part 7 (commencing with Section 36600) of
 Division 18 of the Streets and Highways Code are fees imposed by a government on the stay.

(d) This section shall apply to any advertising, display, or offer before the public in this state, or from this state before the public in any state.

(e) (1) A person that knew or should have known that
 it has advertised, displayed, or offered a room rate in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(2) An action to enforce this section may be brought by a city attorney, district attorney, county counsel, or the Attorney General. 

(f) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any
 duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   (AB 537)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17568.8.

(a) A place of short-term lodging or any other person that advertises or lists a place of short-term lodging as available to rent on an internet website, application, or other similar centralized platform shall include in their short-term lodging listing on the internet website, application, or other similar centralized platform, for the purposes of its compliance with subdivision (b), the following information:

(1) Any additional fees or charges that it will add to the total price to be paid to stay at the short-term lodging, or other penalty that it will impose, if the consumer fails to perform certain cleaning tasks at the end of the stay.

(2) An explicit description of the
 cleaning tasks required to be performed by the consumer that, if not performed, will make the consumer subject to the additional fees, charges, or penalties described in paragraph (1).

(b) A place of short-term lodging, an internet website, application, or other similar centralized platform, or any other person shall include both of the following in a notice that is affirmatively acknowledged by the consumer before the consumer reserves a stay at a place of short-term lodging it advertises or lists as available to rent:

(1) A disclosure of any additional fees or charges that will be added to the total price to be paid to stay at the short-term lodging, or other penalty that will be imposed by the place of short-term lodging or by the website, application, or other similar centralized platform, or any other person if the consumer fails to perform certain cleaning tasks at the end
 of the stay.

(2) An explicit description of the cleaning tasks required to be performed by the consumer that, if not performed, will make the consumer subject to the additional fees, charges, or penalties described in paragraph (1), required by either the place of short-term lodging, by the website, application, or other similar centralized platform, or by any other person.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Notice” means a written or electronic statement that is presented to the consumer in a font size that is at least as large as the standard or default font size of the other text in the advertisement or that is displayed on the internet website, platform, application, or other centralized platform and requires that the consumer interact with the internet website, application,
 or platform to affirmatively acknowledge that they have read the notice. Affirmative acknowledgment may be accomplished by including a statement in the notice that the consumer acknowledges having read the notice before the internet website, application, or platform functions to allow the consumer to reserve the stay.

(2) “Penalty” means subjecting a consumer to inferior terms, privileges, or conditions in comparison to other consumers, including, but not limited to, designating or threatening to designate the consumer as a less favorable guest, decreasing or threatening to decrease the consumer’s status with or on the short-term lodging, internet website, application, or other similar centralized platform, or hindering or barring the consumer from reserving a stay at a place of short-term lodging that would otherwise be advertised or available to the consumer to view and reserve on the internet website, application, or platform.

(3) “Short-term lodging” means a short-term rental, or a residential property in this state that is rented to a visitor for 30 consecutive days or less through a centralized platform whereby the rental is advertised, displayed, or offered and payments for the rental are processed, but does not include a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other similar transient lodging establishment located in this state, nor does it include a residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This section shall apply to any advertising, display, or offer before the public in this state, or from this state before the public in any state.

(e) (1) A person that knew or should have known that it has advertised, displayed, or offered a place of short-term lodging in violation of this
 section shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(2) An action to enforce this section may be brought by a city attorney, district attorney, county counsel, or the Attorney General.

(f) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) This section shall become
 operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   (AB 2202)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. American Indian-Made Articles [17569. - 17569.9.]

17569.

It is unlawful to barter, trade, sell, or offer for sale or trade, any article represented as made by authentic American Indian labor or workmanship, unless the basic article was produced wholly by American Indian labor or workmanship.

Any article bearing a trademark or label registered by Indian persons, groups, bands, tribes, pueblos, or communities with the Indian Arts and Crafts Board in Washington, D.C., or with the American Indian Historical Society, Incorporated, in San Francisco, California, shall be presumed to be authentic.

Only those articles bearing a registered trademark or label
 of authentic Indian labor or workmanship may be deemed an art or craft of authentic Indian labor or workmanship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

17569.9.

“Indian,” as used in this article, means a person who is enrolled or who is a lineal descendant of one enrolled upon an enrollment listing of the Bureau of Indian Affairs, or upon the enrollment listing of a recognized Indian tribe, band or pueblo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Vending Machines  [17570. - 17572.]

17570.

On and after July 1, 1969, every person who owns a vending machine shall have his name and address affixed thereto in a place where it may be seen by anyone using the machine.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that a person owns more than one vending machine located at the same place, such a person may, as an alternative to the above, post a clearly readable sign containing his name and address in a conspicuous location near the machines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

17571.

“Vending machine” means any mechanical device the operation of which depends upon the insertion of a coin or other thing representative of value in the denomination of five cents ($0.05) or more and which dispenses or vends a product, service, or exchange of equal value, other than telephone service furnished under public utility tariffs. The term shall not be construed to include any equipment used by a financial institution for the purpose of facilitating financial transactions, whether such equipment is located on the premises of the financial institution or at a location remote therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

17572.

Any person who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both, for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 53.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Water Treatment Devices [17577. - 17577.6.]

17577.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there have been situations where homeowners have been subjected to fraud, deception, and unfair dealing by certain promoters of water treatment devices. Water contamination problems throughout the nation have created concern among homeowners concerning the quality and healthfulness of home water for drinking. Some promoters of water treatment devices have made false, misleading, and unfair statements in connection with sale of water treatment devices, including, but not limited to, false, misleading, and unfair statements regarding general levels of water contamination, water contamination
 problems actually or potentially affecting particular homeowners, actual or potential health risks associated with the consumption of water, and the features and performance of water treatment devices. As a result of false, misleading, and unfair statements, including statements that have the purpose or effect of alarming the public about the condition of water, many homeowners have been pressured into purchasing water treatment devices without the opportunity to verify the accuracy of the sales representations.

(b) The Legislature also finds and declares that current law does not afford homeowners who enter transactions for the acquisition of water treatment devices the right in all instances to cancel the transaction within three days of its consummation. Moreover, homeowners may be subjected to the loss of their homes through the foreclosure of liens securing financing of water treatment devices.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the protection of homeowners and consumers from untrue and misleading statements and from unfair dealing is of the utmost importance.

(d) The intent and purposes of this article are to safeguard the public against deceit; to ensure, foster, and encourage fair dealing in the sale of water treatment devices; to prohibit misleading representations; to prohibit certain liens on real property; and to afford homeowners a reasonable and meaningful opportunity to rescind transactions for the acquisition of water treatment devices.

(e) This article shall be liberally construed to effectuate the intent and to achieve the purposes described in subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1053, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.1.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Contaminant” or “contamination” means any health-related physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water.
